Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.900.060

Invalidity of part of title not to affect remainder.

If any provision of this title, Title 28A RCW, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the title, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.98.060. Formerly RCW 28A.98.060.]